Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1632
Hearing; decision; when final; judicial review.

A decision of the board following a hearing shall be deemed final subject to the right of judicial review provided in the Administrative Procedure Act. All matters presented at any such hearing shall be acted upon promptly by the board, and the board shall notify all parties in writing of its decision, which shall include a statement of findings and conclusions upon all material issues of fact, law, or discretion presented at the hearing, and the appropriate rule, order, sanction, relief, or denial thereof.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 32;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2832;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 32.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.